apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="f/er__vblex">

  <e>       <p><l>oi</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oy</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ó</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ago</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eigo</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aces</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>az</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ace</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>acen</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ac</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aci</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aci</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ici</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ici</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_fi/ce__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_fi/ce__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ag</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ag</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ici</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fes</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ag</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ag</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eig</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ay</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eit</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eit</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>eits</l>      <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="desfer">          <i>desf</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desfer">   <p><l>esf</l>       <r>desf</r></p><par n="f/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fer">             <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fer a riseta">    <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>riseta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>riseta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a riseta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>riseta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>riseta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a riseta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ra<b/>riseta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>riseta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a riseta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>una<b/>riseta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>riseta</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer a risalleta"> <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>risalleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>risalleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ra<b/>risalleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>una<b/>risalleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>rialleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>rialleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ra<b/>rialleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>una<b/>rialleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>risilleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>risilleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ra<b/>risilleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a risalleta"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>una<b/>risilleta</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>risalleta</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer ploros">      <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ploros</l><r><g><b/>ploros</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer contento">    <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>contento</l><r><g><b/>contento</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer goyo">        <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>goyo</l><r><g><b/>goyo</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer goyo"> <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>goi</l><r><g><b/>goyo</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer fuera">       <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fuera</l><r><g><b/>fuera</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer miedo">       <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>miedo</l><r><g><b/>miedo</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer espanto">     <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>espanto</l><r><g><b/>espanto</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer medrana">     <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>medrana</l><r><g><b/>medrana</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer cera">        <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cera</l><r><g><b/>cera</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer cerina">      <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cerina</l><r><g><b/>cerina</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer por" i="yes"> <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>por</l><r><g><b/>por</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer por">  <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>po</l><r><g><b/>por</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="fer mención de"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>mención<b/><a/>de</l><r><g><b/>mención<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer mención de"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>mención<b/>de</l><r><g><b/>mención<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="fer mención"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>mención</l><r><g><b/>mención</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer-ne mención"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l>-ne<b/>mención</l><r><g>-ne<b/>mención</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer fastio">      <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fastio</l><r><g><b/>fastio</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer olor">        <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>olor</l><r><g><b/>olor</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer buena olor">  <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>buena<b/>olor</l><r><g><b/>buena<b/>olor</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer mala olor">   <i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>mala<b/>olor</l><r><g><b/>mala<b/>olor</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="fer olor de"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>olor<b/><a/>de</l><r><g><b/>olor<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer olor de"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>olor<b/>de</l><r><g><b/>olor<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fer a devantadera"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>devantadera</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>devantadera</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="fer a devantadera"><i>f</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>debantadera</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>devantadera</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="refer">           <i>ref</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="satisfer">        <i>satisf</i><par n="f/er__vblex"/></e>
